tests/ky-adjectives.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../tr-ky.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ky-tr.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[lexc] normal adjectives":
    жаман<adj><norm> : жаман
    мол<adj><norm> : мол
    жакшы<adj><norm> : жакшы
    көк<adj><norm> : көк
  
  "[lexc] comparative adjectives":
    кызыл<adj><comp> : кызылыраак
    таттуу<adj><comp> : таттуураак
    жакшы<adj><comp> : жакшыраак
    кең<adj><comp> : кеңирээк
    сары<adj><comp> : сарыраак
    тоголок<adj><comp> : тоголокураак
    соо<adj><comp> : соороок
    өзгөчө<adj><comp> : өзгөчөрөөк 
